District of Columbia statutes.
16-3713

Judgment where goods are eloigned.

The judgment in a case where the defendant has eloigned the goods sued for, shall be that the plaintiff recover against the defendant the value of the goods as found and the damages so assessed, to be discharged by the return of the things, within ten days after the judgment, with damages for detention, which the jury shall also assess.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 606, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
1981 Ed., § 16-3713.
1973 Ed., § 16-3713.